Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-908
Remedies; venue; process.

An action under sections 48-901 to 48-912 may be brought in the district court of the county where the cause of action or some part thereof arose, or in the county where the defendant labor organization, or some one of the defendant labor organizations, maintains an office, or in which its agents are engaged in acting for or representing employees or in the county where the plaintiff resides and summons may be served upon the defendant labor organization or some one of the defendant labor organizations.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 8, p. 809.

For other provisions for actions against labor organizations, see sections 25-313 and 25-530.08.